Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63.2-1208.
Investigations; report to circuit court.

Upon consideration of the petition, the circuit court shall, upon being satisfied as to proper jurisdiction and venue, immediately enter either an interlocutory order referring the case to a child-placing agency to conduct a visitation and prepare a report of visitation or an order of reference referring the case to a child-placing agency to conduct an investigation and prepare a report of investigation, unless no investigation is required pursuant to this chapter. In agency adoption cases for which an interlocutory order is entered, the petition shall contain the provisional consent of the child-placing agency. The court shall enter the interlocutory order or order of reference concurrently with the entering of an order of publication, if such is necessary. Upon entry of the interlocutory order or order of reference, the clerk shall forward a copy of the interlocutory order or order of reference, the petition, and all exhibits thereto to the Commissioner and the child-placing agency retained to provide investigative, reporting, and supervisory services. If no Virginia agency was retained to provide such services, the interlocutory order or order of reference, petition, and all exhibits shall be forwarded to the local director of social services of the locality where the petitioners reside or resided at the time of filing the petition or had legal residence at the time the petition was filed.

Upon receiving a petition and interlocutory order or order of reference from the circuit court, the applicable agency shall make a thorough investigation of the matter and report thereon in writing, in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe, to the circuit court. In cases in which an order of reference was received, the agency shall file a report of investigation with the circuit court within 60 days after the copy of the petition and all exhibits thereto are forwarded. In cases in which an interlocutory order was received, the agency shall file a report of visitation within 30 days after the completion of all placement visits required pursuant to §

63.2-1212

. In agency adoption cases, as long as the agency continues to recommend the adoption, the agency shall file its final agency consent with the report. A copy of the applicable report to the circuit court shall be served on the Commissioner by delivering or mailing a copy to him on or before the day of filing such report with the circuit court. On the applicable report to the circuit court there shall be appended either acceptance of service or certificate of the local director, or the representative of the child-placing agency, that copies were served as this section requires, showing the date of delivery or mailing. The circuit court shall expeditiously consider the merits of the petition upon receipt of the applicable report and enter a final order of adoption.

If the applicable report is not made to the circuit court within the periods specified, the circuit court may proceed to hear and determine the merits of the petition and enter such order or orders as the circuit court may deem appropriate.

The visitation or investigation requested by the circuit court in an interlocutory order or order of reference shall include, in addition to other inquiries that the circuit court may require the child-placing agency or local director to make, inquiries as to (i) whether the petitioner is financially able, except as provided in Chapter 13 (§

63.2-1300

et seq.), morally suitable, in satisfactory physical and mental health and a proper person to care for and to train the child; (ii) what the physical and mental condition of the child is; (iii) why the parents, if living, desire to be relieved of the responsibility for the custody, care, and maintenance of the child, and what their attitude is toward the proposed adoption; (iv) whether the parents have abandoned the child or are morally unfit to have custody over him; (v) the circumstances under which the child came to live, and is living, in the physical custody of the petitioner; (vi) whether the child is a suitable child for adoption by the petitioner; (vii) what fees have been paid by the petitioners or on their behalf to persons or agencies that have assisted them in obtaining the child; and (viii) whether the requirements of subsections E and F have been met. Any report made to the circuit court shall include a recommendation as to the action to be taken by the circuit court on the petition. A copy of any report made to the circuit court shall be furnished to counsel of record representing the adopting parent or parents. When the investigation reveals that there may have been a violation of §

63.2-1200

or §

63.2-1218

, the local director or child-placing agency shall so inform the circuit court and the Commissioner.

The applicable report shall include the relevant physical and mental history of the birth parents if known to the person making the report. The child-placing agency or local director shall document in the report all efforts they made to encourage birth parents to share information related to their physical and mental history. However, nothing in this subsection shall require that an investigation of the physical and mental history of the birth parents be made.

The applicable report shall include a statement by the child-placing agency or local director that all reasonably ascertainable background, medical, and psychological records of the child, including whether the child has been the subject of an investigation as the perpetrator of sexual abuse, have been provided to the prospective adoptive parent(s). The report also shall include a list of such records provided.

The court may enter a final order of adoption under the following circumstances:

In cases in which an order of reference was entered and the report of investigation has been received, if (i) the child has been placed in the physical custody of the petitioner by a child-placing agency; (ii) the placing or supervising agency certifies to the circuit court that the child has lived in the physical custody of the petitioner continuously for a period of at least six months immediately preceding the filing of the petition and has been visited by a representative of such agency at least three times within a six-month period, provided that there are not less than 90 days between the first and last visit; and (iii) the court is of the opinion that entry of a final order of adoption would otherwise be proper.

In cases in which an interlocutory order was entered and both the report of visitation and final agency consent have been received, if (i) the child has been placed in the physical custody of the petitioner by a child-placing agency; (ii) the placing or supervising agency certifies to the circuit court that the child has been visited by a representative of such agency at least three times within a six-month period, provided that there are not less than 90 days between the first and last visit; and (iii) the court is of the opinion that entry of a final order of adoption would otherwise be proper.

In cases in which the court entered either an interlocutory order or order of reference and the child was placed by a child-placing agency, the circuit court may, for good cause shown, omit the requirement that the three visits be made within a six-month period, provided that not less than three visits were made.

If the specific provisions set out in §§

63.2-1228

,

63.2-1238

,

63.2-1242

and

63.2-1244

do not apply, the petition and all exhibits shall be forwarded to the local director where the petitioners reside or to a licensed child-placing agency.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-348.1, 63-349, 63-356.1; 1950, pp. 441, 626; 1954, c. 489; 1956, cc. 187, 300, 489; 1962, c. 603; 1964, cc. 139, 429; 1968, cc. 346, 578, §§ 63.1-222, 63.1-223, 63.1-231; 1972, c. 823; 1974, cc. 26, 337, 421, 493, 507; 1975, c. 364; 1977, c. 526; 1978, c. 730; 1979 c. 339; 1980, c. 740; 1982, c. 115; 1985, cc. 298, 300; 1986, cc. 481, 482; 1987, c. 482; 1988, cc. 53, 579, 599, 882; 1989, c. 647; 1992, c. 607; 1993, c. 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, §§ 63.1-219.35, 63.1-219.45, 63.1-219.49, 63.1-219.51; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 502; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2007, c. 446; 2018, c. 694; 2022, c. 377.

Cross references.

As to filing petition for agency adoption, see §

63.2-1227

.

As to foster parent adoption, see §

63.2-1229

.

For requirements of a parental placement adoption, see §

63.2-1232

.

As to return and disposition of report, see §

63.2-1239

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 502, in subsection A, substituted “90” for “ninety,” and “21” for “twenty-one”; and added the second sentence in subsection D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are identical, and added subsection A; redesignated former subsections A through E as subsections B through F and in subsection B, substituted “60 days” for “90 days” in the first sentence, deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The Commissioner may notify the circuit court within 21 days of the date of delivery or mailing of the report as shown by the agency, during which time the circuit court shall withhold consideration of the merits of the petition pending review of the agency report by the Commissioner, of any disapproval thereof stating reasons for any further action on the report that he deems necessary” and added the last sentence; and substituted “physical custody” for “same home” in clause (v) of the first sentence in subsection D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 446 in subsection D, deleted “and” at the end of clause (vi), added “and” at the end of clause (vii) and added clause (viii); added present subsection F; and redesignated former subsection F as present subsection G.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 694 inserted “including whether the child has been the subject of an investigation as the perpetrator of sexual abuse” in subsection F.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 377 rewrote subsections A and B, which read: “A. Upon consideration of the petition, the circuit court shall, upon being satisfied as to proper jurisdiction and venue, immediately enter an order referring the case to a child-placing agency to conduct an investigation and prepare a report unless no investigation is required pursuant to this chapter. The court shall enter the order of reference prior to or concurrently with the entering of an order of publication, if such is necessary. Upon entry of the order of reference, the clerk shall forward a copy of the order of reference, the petition, and all exhibits thereto to the Commissioner and the child-placing agency retained to provide investigative, reporting, and supervisory services. If no Virginia agency was retained to provide such services, the order of reference, petition, and all exhibits shall be forwarded to the local director of social services of the locality where the petitioners reside or resided at the time of filing the petition or had legal residence at the time the petition was filed. “B. Upon receiving a petition and order of reference from the circuit court, the applicable agency shall make a thorough investigation of the matter and report thereon in writing, in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe, to the circuit court within 60 days after the copy of the petition and all exhibits thereto are forwarded. A copy of the report to the circuit court shall be served on the Commissioner by delivering or mailing a copy to him on or before the day of filing the report with the circuit court. On the report to the circuit court there shall be appended either acceptance of service or certificate of the local director, or the representative of the child-placing agency, that copies were served as this section requires, showing the date of delivery or mailing. The circuit court shall expeditiously consider the merits of the petition upon receipt of the report”; in subsections C, E, and F, inserted “applicable”; in subsection D in the first sentence in the introductory language inserted “visitation or” and “in an interlocutory order or order of reference”; and in clause (i), deleted “of this title” following “Chapter 13 (§

63.2-1300

et seq.)”; added subsection G; and redesignated accordingly.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 417 (2007).

§ 63.2-1209.
Entry of interlocutory order.

If, in the case of a direct parental placement adoption pursuant to §

63.2-1230

or in circumstances in which an interlocutory order is necessary in an agency adoption, after considering the home study or any required report, the circuit court is satisfied that all of the applicable requirements have been complied with, that the petitioner is financially able to maintain adequately, except as provided in Chapter 13 (§

63.2-1300

et seq.) of this title, and is morally suitable and a proper person to care for and train the child, that the child is suitable for adoption by the petitioner, and that the best interests of the child will be promoted by the adoption, it shall enter an interlocutory order of adoption declaring that henceforth, subject to the probationary period hereinafter provided for and to the provisions of the final order of adoption, the child will be, to all intents and purposes, the child of the petitioner. If the petition includes a prayer for a change of the child’s name and the circuit court is satisfied that such change is in the best interests of the child, upon entry of final order, the name of the child shall be changed. An attested copy of every interlocutory order of adoption shall be forwarded forthwith by the clerk of the circuit court in which it was entered to the Commissioner and to the licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency or the local director that prepared the required home study or report. The agency or director shall, after receipt of the attested copy of the interlocutory order of adoption, prepare a report of visitation pursuant to §

63.2-1212

.

If the circuit court denies the petition for adoption and if it appears to the circuit court that the child is without proper care, custody or guardianship, the circuit court may, in its discretion, appoint a guardian for the child or commit the child to a custodial agency as provided for in §§ 16.1-278.2, 16.1-278.3 and

64.2-1703

, respectively.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-352; 1954, c. 489; 1964, c. 429; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-226; 1974, c. 507; 1975, c. 364; 1989, c. 647; 1991, c. 534; 1992, c. 607; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.16; 2002, c. 747; 2009, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “31-5” was changed to “64.2-1703” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805, in the first paragraph, inserted “in the case of a direct parental placement adoption pursuant to §

63.2-1230

or in circumstances in which an interlocutory order is necessary in an agency adoption” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

§ 63.2-1210.
Probationary period, interlocutory order and order of reference not required under certain circumstances.

The circuit court may omit the probationary period and the interlocutory order and enter a final order of adoption under the following circumstances:

If the child is legally the child by birth or adoption of one of the petitioners and the circuit court is of the opinion that the entry of an interlocutory order would otherwise be proper. In such cases, the court may also omit the order of reference if the petitioners meet the requirements set forth in §

63.2-1241

.

If one of the petitioners is a stepparent of the child and the circuit court is of the opinion that the entry of an interlocutory order would otherwise be proper. The court may omit the order of reference if the petitioners meet the requirements of §

63.2-1241

.

After receipt of the report of investigation, if the child has been in physical custody of the petitioner continuously for at least three years immediately prior to the filing of the petition for adoption, and the circuit court is of the opinion that the entry of an interlocutory order would otherwise be proper.

After receipt of the report of investigation, if the child has been legally adopted according to the laws of a foreign country with which the United States has diplomatic relations and if the circuit court is of the opinion that the entry of an interlocutory order would otherwise be proper, and the child (i) has been in the physical custody of the petitioners for at least one year immediately prior to the filing of the petition and a representative of a child-placing agency has visited the petitioner and child at least once in the six months immediately preceding the filing of the petition or during its investigation pursuant to §

63.2-1208

or (ii) has been in the physical custody of the petitioners for at least six months immediately prior to the filing of the petition, has been visited by a representative of a child-placing agency or of the local department three times within such six-month period with no fewer than ninety days between the first and last visits, and the last visit has occurred within six months immediately prior to the filing of the petition.

After receipt of the report of investigation, if the child was placed into Virginia from a foreign country in accordance with §

63.2-1104

, the adoption was not finalized pursuant to the laws of that foreign country, and the child has been in the physical custody of the petitioner for at least six months immediately prior to the filing of the petition and has been visited by a representative of a licensed child-placing agency or of the local department three times within the six-month period with no fewer than 90 days between the first and last visits. The circuit court may, for good cause shown, in cases of an international placement, omit the requirement that the three visits be made within a six-month period.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-355; 1952, c. 71; 1954, c. 489; 1962, c. 603; 1964, c. 429; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-229; 1975, c. 364; 1978, c. 750; 1980, c. 268; 1983, c. 334; 1986, c. 470; 1992, c. 607; 1993, c. 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.17; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2011, c. 486; 2022, c. 377.

Cross references.

As to fees collected by clerks of circuit courts generally, see §

17.1-275

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are virtually identical, and rewrote the section. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825 is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 486, in subdivision 6, inserted “the adoption was not finalized pursuant to the laws of that foreign country” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 377 added the second sentence in subdivision 1; deleted former subdivision 3, which read: “After receipt of the report required by §

63.2-1208

, if the child has been placed in the physical custody of the petitioner by a child-placing agency and (i) the placing or supervising agency certifies to the circuit court that the child has lived in the physical custody of the petitioner continuously for a period of at least six months immediately preceding the filing of the petition and has been visited by a representative of such agency at least three times within a six-month period, provided there are not less than 90 days between the first visit and the last visit, and (ii) the circuit court is of the opinion that the entry of an interlocutory order would otherwise be proper. The circuit court may, for good cause shown, in cases of placement by a child-placing agency, omit the requirement that the three visits be made within a six-month period”; redesignated accordingly; in current subdivisions 3 through 5, inserted “of investigation”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 63.2-1211.
Revocation of interlocutory order.

The circuit court may, by order entered of record, revoke its interlocutory order of adoption at any time prior to the entry of the final order, for good cause shown, on its own motion, or on the motion of the birth parents of the child, or of the petitioner, or of the child himself by his next friend, or of the child-placing agency, which placed the child with the petitioners or of the Commissioner; but, no such order of revocation shall be entered, except on motion of the petitioner, unless the petitioner is given ten days’ notice of such motion in writing and an opportunity to be heard or has removed from the Commonwealth. The clerk of the circuit court shall forward an attested copy of every such order to the Commissioner and to the child-placing agency that placed the child.

When an interlocutory order has been entered and subsequently is revoked, the circuit court may proceed in the same manner as set forth in §

63.2-1209

to enter an order concerning the subsequent custody or guardianship of the child.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-353; 1954, c. 489; 1964, c. 429; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-227; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.18; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1212.
Visitations during probationary period and report.

Except as hereinafter provided, after the entry of an interlocutory order of adoption, (i) the licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency; (ii) if the child was not placed by an agency and the placement is not a parental placement, the local director; (iii) if the placement is a parental placement, the child-placing agency that submitted the home study; or, (iv) if the child was placed by an agency in another state or by an agency, court, or other entity in another country, the local director or licensed child-placing agency, whichever agency completed the home study or provided supervision, shall cause or have caused the child to be visited at least three times within a period of six months by an agent of such local board or local department or by an agent of such licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency. Whenever practicable, such visits shall be made within the six-month period immediately following the date upon which the child was placed in the physical care of the adoptive parents or of entry of the interlocutory order; however, no less than ninety days shall elapse between the first visit and the last visit. The agency that placed the child, the child-placing agency that submitted the home study, the local director or the licensed child-placing agency, as applicable, shall make a written report to the circuit court, in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe, of the findings made pursuant to such visitations. A copy of the report to the circuit court shall be furnished to the counsel of record for the parties, which copy shall be returned by such counsel as is required by §

63.2-1246

for the return of the original report. A copy of the report to the circuit court shall be served on the Commissioner by delivering or mailing a copy to him on or before the day of filing the report with the circuit court. On the report to the circuit court there shall be appended either acceptance of service or certification of the local director or the representative of the child-placing agency, that copies were served as this section requires, showing the date of delivery or mailing.

The three supervisory visits required in subsection A shall be conducted in the presence of the child. At least one such visit shall be conducted in the home of the petitioners in the presence of the child and both petitioners, unless the petition was filed by a single parent or one of the petitioners is no longer residing in the home.

When it is determined for purposes of subsection B that the petitioner no longer resides in the adoptive home, the child-placing agency or local director shall contact the petitioner to determine whether or not the petitioner wishes to remain a party to the proceedings and shall include in its report to the circuit court the results of its findings.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-354; 1956, c. 187; 1962, c. 603; 1964, c. 429; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-228; 1972, c. 73; 1975, c. 364; 1976, c. 367; 1980, c. 740; 1988, c. 599; 1989, c. 647; 1992, c. 607; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.19; 2002, c. 747; 2007, cc. 606, 623; 2009, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to filing petition for agency adoption, see §

63.2-1227

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and deleted the last sentence from subsection A, which read: “The Commissioner may notify the circuit court within twenty-one days of the date of delivery or mailing of the report as shown by the agency, during which time the circuit court shall withhold consideration of the merits of the report pending review of the report by the Commissioner, of any disapproval thereof stating reasons for any further action on the report that he deems necessary.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805 inserted “or have caused” and “upon which the child was placed in the physical care of the adoptive parents or” in subsection A.

§ 63.2-1213.
Final order of adoption.

After consideration of the report made pursuant to §

63.2-1212

or as permitted pursuant to §

63.2-1210

, if the circuit court is satisfied that the best interests of the child will be served thereby, the circuit court shall enter the final order of adoption. However, a final order of adoption shall not be entered until information has been furnished by the petitioner in compliance with §

32.1-262

unless the circuit court, for good cause shown, finds the information to be unavailable or unnecessary. No circuit court shall deny a petitioner a final order of adoption for the sole reason that the child was placed in the physical custody of the petitioner by a person not authorized to make such placements pursuant to §

63.2-1200

. An attested copy of every final order of adoption shall be forwarded, by the clerk of the circuit court in which it was entered, to the Commissioner and to the child-placing agency that placed the child or to the local director, in cases where the child was not placed by an agency.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-356; 1962, c. 603; 1964, c. 429; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-230; 1975, c. 364; 1981, c. 318; 1988, c. 431; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.20; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2007, cc. 606, 623.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are identical, and in the first sentence, substituted “After consideration of” for “After the expiration of six months from the date upon which the interlocutory order is entered, and after considering,” inserted “or as permitted pursuant to §

63.2-1210

” and added the proviso to the end and substituted “in the physical custody of the petitioner” for “in the adoptive home” in the next-to-last sentence. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and deleted “provided that the child has been in the physical custody of the petitioner for at least six months immediately prior to entry of the order” from the end of the first sentence.

§ 63.2-1214.
Annual review of pending petitions for adoption; duty of Commissioner and circuit court clerk.

After the expiration of twelve months from the date of the entry of the last order upon a petition for adoption, except when the last order entered is a final order of adoption, it shall be the responsibility of the Commissioner to notify the clerk of the circuit court of all adoption cases that have been pending for a period of more than twelve months, and the clerk of the circuit court shall place on the docket all such cases for review by the circuit court as soon as practicable.

History.

1976, c. 353, § 63.1-230.1; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.21; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1215.
Legal effects of adoption.

The birth parents, and the parents by previous adoption, if any, other than any such parent who is the husband or wife of one of the petitioners, shall, by final order of adoption, be divested of all legal rights and obligations in respect to the child including the right to petition any court for visitation with the child. Except where a final order of adoption is entered pursuant to §

63.2-1241

, any person whose interest in the child derives from or through the birth parent or previous adoptive parent, including but not limited to grandparents, stepparents, former stepparents, blood relatives and family members shall, by final order of adoption, be divested of all legal rights and obligations in respect to the child including the right to petition any court for visitation with the child. In all cases the child shall be free from all legal obligations of obedience and maintenance in respect to such persons divested of legal rights. Any child adopted under the provisions of this chapter shall, from and after the entry of the interlocutory order or from and after the entry of the final order where no such interlocutory order is entered, be, to all intents and purposes, the child of the person or persons so adopting him, and, unless and until such interlocutory order or final order is subsequently revoked, shall be entitled to all the rights and privileges, and subject to all the obligations, of a child of such person or persons born in lawful wedlock. An adopted person is the child of an adopting parent, and as such, the adopting parent shall be entitled to testify in all cases civil and criminal, as if the adopted child was born of the adopting parent in lawful wedlock.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-357; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-233; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1997, c. 690; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.22; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 229.

Cross references.

As to effect of agreement entrusting child to licensed child-placing agency or local board for adoption, see §

63.2-903

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 229 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 343 (2012).

§ 63.2-1216.
Final order not subject to attack after six months.

After the expiration of six months from the date of entry of any final order of adoption from which no appeal has been taken to the Court of Appeals, the validity thereof shall not be subject to attack in any proceedings, collateral or direct, for any reason, including but not limited to fraud, duress, failure to give any required notice, failure of any procedural requirement, or lack of jurisdiction over any person, and such order shall be final for all purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-361; 1954, c. 489; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-237; 1984, c. 703; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.23; 2002, c. 747.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limitation of Actions, § 2.

§ 63.2-1217.
Provision of false information; penalty.

Any person who knowingly and intentionally provides false information in writing and under oath, which is material to an adoptive placement shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony. The Commissioner is authorized to investigate such cases and may refer the case to the attorney for the Commonwealth for prosecution.

History.

1995, cc. 772, 826, § 63.1-220.6; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.24; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 63.2-1218.
Certain exchange of property, advertisement, solicitation prohibited; penalty.

No person or child-placing agency shall charge, pay, give, or agree to give or accept any money, property, service or other thing of value in connection with a placement or adoption or any act undertaken pursuant to this chapter except (i) reasonable and customary services provided by a licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency and fees paid for such services; (ii) payment or reimbursement for medical expenses and insurance premiums that are directly related to the birth mother’s pregnancy and hospitalization for the birth of the child who is the subject of the adoption proceedings, for mental health counseling received by the birth mother or birth father related to the adoption, and for expenses incurred for medical care for the child; (iii) payment or reimbursement for reasonable and necessary expenses for food, clothing, and shelter when, upon the written advice of her physician, the birth mother is unable to work or otherwise support herself due to medical reasons or complications associated with the pregnancy or birth of the child; (iv) payment or reimbursement for reasonable expenses incurred incidental to any required court appearance including, but not limited to, transportation, food and lodging; (v) usual and customary fees for legal services in adoption proceedings; and (vi) payment or reimbursement of reasonable expenses incurred for transportation in connection with any of the services specified in this section or intercountry placements as defined in §

63.2-100

and as necessary for compliance with state and federal law in such placements. No person shall advertise or solicit to perform any activity prohibited by this section. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony. The Commissioner is authorized to investigate cases in which fees paid for legal services appear to be in excess of usual and customary fees in order to determine if there has been compliance with the provisions of this section.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.4; 1993, c. 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.25; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

For requirement that the court be informed when in the course of an investigation upon receipt
of an adoption petition, it appears that there may have been a violation of §

63.2-1200

or §

63.2-1218

, see §

63.2-1208

.

For requirements of a parental placement adoption, see §

63.2-1232

.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 63.2-1219.
Suspected violation of property exchange information.

If the juvenile and domestic relations or circuit court or any participating licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency suspects that there has been a violation of §

63.2-1218

in connection with a placement or adoption, it shall report such findings to the Commissioner for investigation and appropriate action. If the Commissioner suspects that a person has violated §

63.2-1218

, he shall report his findings to the appropriate attorney for the Commonwealth. If the Commissioner believes that such violation has occurred in the course of the practice of a profession or occupation licensed or regulated pursuant to Title 54.1, he shall also report such findings to the appropriate regulatory authority for investigation and appropriate disciplinary action.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.3; 1991, cc. 364, 602; 1992, c. 125; 1993, cc. 338, 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.26; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

For requirements of a parental placement adoption, see §

63.2-1232

.

§ 63.2-1220.
Issuance of birth certificates for children adopted in the Commonwealth.

For the purpose of securing a new birth certificate for a child adopted pursuant to the laws of the Commonwealth, the procedures set forth in §

32.1-262

shall be followed. The Department shall furnish a document listing all post-adoption services available to adoptive families to the State Registrar of Vital Records for distribution to adoptive parents pursuant to §

32.1-261

.

The Department of Social Services shall update annually and make available on its website the document listing all post-adoption services available to adoptive families pursuant to this section.

History.

1970, c. 672, § 63.1-221.1; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.27; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 985; 2011, c. 486; 2015, cc. 5, 17.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 5 and 17, cl. 2 was codified as the second paragraph of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 985 inserted the subsection A designation; and added subsections B and C.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 486 deleted the subsection A designation; substituted “for a child adopted pursuant to the laws of the Commonwealth” for “for an adopted child”; deleted subsection B, which concerned petitioning the circuit court for a Virginia certificate of birth for a child adopted in a foreign country and duty for parents to provide evidence of admission into the United States and a signed affidavit; and deleted subsection C, which concerned compliance with all adoption requirements of this chapter in order to get a Virginia certificate of birth.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 5 and 17 are identical, and added the second sentence.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 38 Appeals to the Court of Appeals of Virginia. § 38.27 Finality of Decisions of Court of Appeals; Review by Supreme Court. Chapter 39A Interlocutory Appeals. § 39A.01 Interlocutory Appeal Statute. Friend.

§ 63.2-1220.01.
Foreign adoptions; establishment of date of birth.

A circuit court may, as part of a proceeding for the adoption of a child born in a foreign country or upon petition to amend a certificate of birth for a person born in a foreign country, correct or establish a date of birth for such person. In cases in which adoptive parents are unable to ascertain the date of birth of the child or in which medical evidence indicates that the stated date of birth of the child is incorrect, the court may establish a corrected date of birth based on medical evidence of the child’s actual age and the State Registrar of Vital Records shall issue a certificate of birth pursuant to §

32.1-261

showing the date of birth established by the court.

History.

2012, c. 424.